Florida, session 2026, HB307.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsections (1), (2), and (5) of section
1009.265, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
1009.265 State employee and sheriff's office employee fee
waivers.—
(1) As a benefit to the employer and employees of the
state and each sheriff's office in the state, subject to
approval by an employee's agency head or sheriff, or the
equivalent, each state university and Florida College System
institution shall waive tuition and fees for state employees and
sheriff's office employees to enroll for up to 6 credit hours of
courses per term on a space-available basis.
(2) The Chief Financial Officer, in cooperation with the
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb307-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 307 2026
Florida College System institutions and state universities,
shall identify and implement ways to ease the administrative
burden to Florida College System institutions and state
universities, including, but not limited to, providing easier
access to verify state or sheriff's office employment.
(5) For purposes of this section:,
(a) Employees of the state include employees of the
executive, legislative, and judicial branches of state
government, except for persons employed by a state university.
(b) Employees of a sheriff's office include any full-time
sworn law enforcement officer, correctional officer, or civilian
employee of the sheriff's office.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb307-00